Hawaii, session 2025, HB114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $647,592 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to establish permanent positions in adult services probation of the first circuit court, including: (1)  $63,096 each for seven full-time equivalent (7.0 FTE) probation officer positions; (2)  $41,808 each for two full-time equivalent (2.0 FTE) social worker assistant positions; (3)  $40,248 each for two full-time equivalent (2.0 FTE) clerk positions; and (4)  $41,808 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) secretary position. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the judiciary for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $140,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for operating expenses for adult services probation of the first circuit court. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the judiciary for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________